Utah statutes.
10-3b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Council-mayor form of government" means the form of municipal government that:

(a) (i)  is provided for in Laws of Utah 1977, Chapter 48;

(ii)  may not be adopted without voter approval; and

(iii)  consists of two separate, independent, and equal branches of municipal government; and

(b)  on and after May 5, 2008, is described in Part 2, Council-Mayor Form of Municipal Government.

(2)  "Five-member council form of government" means the form of municipal government described in Part 4, Five-Member Council Form of Municipal Government.

(3)  "Six-member council form of government" means the form of municipal government described in Part 3, Six-Member Council Form of Municipal Government.

